California, session 20252026, AB634.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 16.7 (commencing with Section 109024) is added to Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 16.7. Tianeptine109024. (a) (1) A person or An entity shall not manufacture, distribute, or offer for sale in this state a product that contains tianeptine. tianeptine or that is marketed as containing tianeptine.(2) Every product manufactured, distributed, or offered for sale in this state that contains tianeptine or that is marketed as containing tianeptine shall constitute a violation of this section.(b) (1) Upon an action brought by the Attorney General, a city attorney, or a county counsel, a person or an entity that violates subdivision (a) shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a first violation, and not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each subsequent violation.(2) This section does not impair or impede any other rights, causes of action, claims, or defenses available under any other law. The remedies provided in this section are cumulative with any other remedies available under any other law.(c) A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(d) For purposes of this section, “entity” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other business entity.